Nebraska, session 109, LB492.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-245, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-245 For purposes of the Nebraska Juvenile Code, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Abandonment means a parent's intentionally withholding from a
child, without just cause or excuse, the parent's presence, care, love,
protection, and maintenance and the opportunity for the display of
parental affection for the child;
(2) Age of majority means nineteen years of age;
(3) Alternative to detention means a program or directive that
increases supervision of a youth in the community in an effort to ensure
the youth attends court and refrains from committing a new law violation.
Alternative to detention includes, but is not limited to, electronic
monitoring, day and evening reporting centers, house arrest, tracking,
family crisis response, and temporary shelter placement. Except for the
use of manually controlled delayed egress of not more than thirty
seconds, placements that utilize physical construction or hardware to
restrain a youth's freedom of movement and ingress and egress from
placement are not considered alternatives to detention;
(4) Approved center means a center that has applied for and received
approval from the Director of the Office of Dispute Resolution under
section 25-2909;
(5) Civil citation means a noncriminal notice which cannot result in
a criminal record and is described in section 43-248.02;
(6) Cost or costs means (a) the sum or equivalent expended, paid, or
charged for goods or services, or expenses incurred, or (b) the
contracted or negotiated price;
(7) Criminal street gang means a group of three or more people with
a common identifying name, sign, or symbol whose group identity or
purposes include engaging in illegal activities;
(8) Criminal street gang member means a person who willingly or
-2-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
voluntarily becomes and remains a member of a criminal street gang;
(9) Custodian means a nonparental caretaker having physical custody
of the juvenile and includes an appointee described in section 43-294;
(10) Guardian means a person, other than a parent, who has qualified
by law as the guardian of a juvenile pursuant to testamentary or court
appointment, but excludes a person who is merely a guardian ad litem;
(11) Habitually truant from school means that a child thirteen years
of age or older and younger than seventeen years of age who is enrolled
in a public, private, denominational, or parochial school has accrued
twenty days or more of unexcused absences from school during a school
year and has a documented loss of educational attainment as a result of
such absences.
(12) (11) Juvenile means any person under the age of eighteen;
(13) (12) Juvenile court means the separate juvenile court where it
has been established pursuant to sections 43-2,111 to 43-2,127 and the
county court sitting as a juvenile court in all other counties. Nothing
in the Nebraska Juvenile Code shall be construed to deprive the district
courts of their habeas corpus, common-law, or chancery jurisdiction or
the county courts and district courts of jurisdiction of domestic
relations matters as defined in section 25-2740;
(14) (13) Juvenile detention facility has the same meaning as in
section 83-4,125;
(15) (14) Legal custody has the same meaning as in section 43-2922;
(16) (15) Mental health facility means a treatment facility as
defined in section 71-914 or a government, private, or state hospital
which treats mental illness;
(17) (16) Nonoffender means a juvenile who is subject to the
jurisdiction of the juvenile court for reasons other than legally
prohibited conduct, including, but not limited to, juveniles described in
subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247;
(18) (17) Parent means one or both parents or stepparents when the
-3-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
stepparent is married to a parent who has physical custody of the
juvenile as of the filing of the petition;
(19) (18) Parties means the juvenile as described in section 43-247
and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian;
(20) (19) Physical custody has the same meaning as in section
43-2922;
(21) (20) Except in proceedings under the Nebraska Indian Child
Welfare Act, relative means father, mother, grandfather, grandmother,
brother, sister, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle,
aunt, first cousin, nephew, or niece;
(22) (21) Restorative justice means practices, programs, or services
that emphasize repairing the harm caused to victims and the community by
persons who have caused the harm or committed an offense. Restorative
justice practices may include, but are not limited to, victim youth
conferencing, victim-offender mediation, youth or community dialogue,
panels, circles, and truancy mediation;
(23) (22) Restorative justice facilitator means a qualified
individual who has been trained to facilitate restorative justice
practices. A qualified individual shall be approved by the referring
county attorney, city attorney, or juvenile or county court judge.
Factors for approval may include, but are not limited to, an individual's
education and training in restorative justice principles and practices;
experience in facilitating restorative justice sessions; understanding of
the necessity to do no harm to either the victim or the person who harmed
the victim; and proven commitment to ethical practices;
(24) (23) Seal a record means that a record shall not be available
to the public except upon the order of a court upon good cause shown;
(25) (24) Secure detention means detention in a highly structured,
residential, hardware-secured facility designed to restrict a juvenile's
movement;
(26) (25) Staff secure juvenile facility means a juvenile
-4-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
residential facility operated by a political subdivision (a) which does
not include construction designed to physically restrict the movements
and activities of juveniles who are in custody in the facility, (b) in
which physical restriction of movement or activity of juveniles is
provided solely through staff, (c) which may establish reasonable rules
restricting ingress to and egress from the facility, and (d) in which the
movements and activities of individual juvenile residents may, for
treatment purposes, be restricted or subject to control through the use
of intensive staff supervision. Staff secure juvenile facility does not
include any institution operated by the Department of Correctional
Services;
(27) (26) Status offender means a juvenile who has been charged with
or adjudicated for conduct which would not be a crime if committed by an
adult, including, but not limited to, juveniles charged under subdivision
(3)(b) of section 43-247 and sections 53-180.01 and 53-180.02;
(28) (27) Traffic offense means any nonfelonious act in violation of
a law or ordinance regulating vehicular or pedestrian travel, whether
designated a misdemeanor or a traffic infraction; and
(29) (28) Young adult means an individual older than eighteen years
of age but under twenty-one years of age.
Sec. 2. Section 43-247, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-247 The juvenile court in each county shall have jurisdiction of:
(1) Any juvenile who has committed an act other than a traffic
offense which would constitute a misdemeanor or an infraction under the
laws of this state, or violation of a city or village ordinance, and who
was eleven years of age or older at the time the act was committed;
(2) Any juvenile who has committed an act which would constitute a
felony under the laws of this state and who was eleven years of age or
older at the time the act was committed;
(3) Any juvenile:
-5-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
(a) Who is homeless or destitute, or without proper support through
no fault of his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; who is abandoned
by his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; who lacks proper parental
care by reason of the fault or habits of his or her parent, guardian, or
custodian; whose parent, guardian, or custodian neglects or refuses to
provide proper or necessary subsistence, education, or other care
necessary for the health, morals, or well-being of such juvenile; whose
parent, guardian, or custodian is unable to provide or neglects or
refuses to provide special care made necessary by the mental condition of
the juvenile; who is in a situation or engages in an occupation,
including prostitution, dangerous to life or limb or injurious to the
health or morals of such juvenile; or who has committed an act or engaged
in behavior described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of this
section and who was under eleven years of age at the time of such act or
behavior;
(b)(i) (b) Who is eleven years of age or older and who (A) (i) by
reason of being wayward or habitually disobedient, is uncontrolled by his
or her parent, guardian, or custodian; (B) (ii) deports himself or
herself so as to injure or endanger seriously the morals or health of
himself, herself, or others; or (C) (iii) is habitually truant from home;
or
(ii) Who is habitually truant from school; or
(c) Who is mentally ill and dangerous as defined in section 71-908;
(4) Any juvenile who has committed an act which would constitute a
traffic offense as defined in section 43-245 and who was eleven years of
age or older at the time the act was committed;
(5) The parent, guardian, or custodian of any juvenile described in
this section;
(6) The proceedings for termination of parental rights;
(7) Any juvenile who has been voluntarily relinquished, pursuant to
section 43-106.01, to the Department of Health and Human Services or any
-6-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
child placement agency licensed by the Department of Health and Human
Services;
(8) Any juvenile who was a ward of the juvenile court at the
inception of his or her guardianship and whose guardianship has been
disrupted or terminated;
(9) The adoption or guardianship proceedings for a child over which
the juvenile court already has jurisdiction under another provision of
the Nebraska Juvenile Code;
(10) The paternity or custody determination for a child over which
the juvenile court already has jurisdiction;
(11) The proceedings under the Young Adult Bridge to Independence
Act; and
(12) Except as provided in subdivision (11) of this section, any
individual adjudged to be within the provisions of this section until the
individual reaches the age of majority or the court otherwise discharges
the individual from its jurisdiction.
Notwithstanding the provisions of the Nebraska Juvenile Code, the
determination of jurisdiction over any Indian child as defined in section
43-1503 shall be subject to the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act; and
the district court shall have exclusive jurisdiction in proceedings
brought pursuant to section 71-510.
Sec. 3. Section 43-276, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-276 (1) The county attorney or city attorney, in making the
determination whether to file a criminal charge, file a juvenile court
petition, offer juvenile pretrial diversion or restorative justice, or
transfer a case to or from juvenile court, and the juvenile court, county
court, or district court in making the determination whether to transfer
a case, shall consider: (a) The type of treatment such juvenile would
most likely be amenable to; (b) whether there is evidence that the
alleged offense included violence; (c) the motivation for the commission
-7-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
of the offense; (d) the age of the juvenile and the ages and
circumstances of any others involved in the offense; (e) the previous
history of the juvenile, including whether he or she had been convicted
of any previous offenses or adjudicated in juvenile court; (f) the best
interests of the juvenile; (g) consideration of public safety; (h)
consideration of the juvenile's ability to appreciate the nature and
seriousness of his or her conduct; (i) whether the best interests of the
juvenile and the security of the public may require that the juvenile
continue in secure detention or under supervision for a period extending
beyond his or her minority and, if so, the available alternatives best
suited to this purpose; (j) whether the victim or juvenile agree to
participate in restorative justice; (k) whether there is a juvenile
pretrial diversion program established pursuant to sections 43-260.02 to
43-260.07; (l) whether the juvenile has been convicted of or has
acknowledged unauthorized use or possession of a firearm; (m) whether a
juvenile court order has been issued for the juvenile pursuant to section
43-2,106.03; (n) whether the juvenile is a criminal street gang member;
and (o) such other matters as the parties deem relevant to aid in the
decision.
(2) Prior to filing a petition alleging that a juvenile is a
juvenile as described in subdivision (3)(b) of section 43-247, the county
attorney shall make reasonable efforts to refer the juvenile and family
to community-based resources available to address the juvenile's
behaviors, provide crisis intervention, and maintain the juvenile safely
in the home. Failure to describe the efforts required by this subsection
shall be a defense to adjudication.
(3)(a) It shall be a defense to adjudication of a petition alleging
that a juvenile is a juvenile as described in subdivision (3)(b)(ii) of
section 43-247, if, after subtracting any absences that are excludable
under subdivision (3)(b) of this section, the child has accrued less than
twenty days of unexcused absences from school during the school year.
-8-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
(b) An absence shall not be counted for purposes of subdivision (3)
(b)(ii) of section 43-247 if such absence:
(i) Was caused by:
(A) A lack of adequate transportation;
(B) Failure by the school to coordinate necessary interventions or
attendance supports agreed upon by the school and the child's family; or
(C) Physical or mental illness excused by a parent or guardian, with
or without a note from a doctor or physician; or
(ii) Is otherwise excused by the school or the court.
Sec. 4. Section 79-206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-206 Each superintendent of a school district, using the list
specified in section 79-205, shall (1) shall compare the names of the
children enrolled with the last census report on file in his or her
office from such district, (2) shall prepare a list of all children
resident in such district under his or her jurisdiction who are not
attending school as provided in section 79-201, and (3) may transmit the
list to the officer or officers in such district whose duty it is to
enforce the provisions of such section.
Sec. 5. Section 79-209, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-209 (1) In all school districts in this state, any
superintendent, principal, teacher, or member of the school board who
knows of any violation of subsection (2) of section 79-201 shall within
three days report such violation to the attendance officer of the school,
who shall immediately investigate the case. When of his or her personal
knowledge or by report or complaint from any resident of the district,
the attendance officer believes that there is a violation of subsection
(2) of section 79-201, the attendance officer shall immediately
investigate such alleged violation.
(2) All school boards shall have a written policy on attendance
-9-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
developed and annually reviewed in collaboration with the county attorney
of the county in which the principal office of the school district is
located. The policy shall include a provision indicating how the school
district will handle cases in which excessive absences are due to
illness. The policy shall also state the circumstances and number of
absences or the hourly equivalent upon which the school shall render all
services to address barriers to attendance. Such services shall be
provided prior to upon twenty days of absence, and shall include, but not
be limited to:
(a) Written communication by school officials with the person or
persons who have legal or actual charge or control of any child; and
(b) One or more meetings between, at a minimum, a school attendance
officer, a school social worker, or a school administrator or his or her
designee, the person who has legal or actual charge or control of the
child, the person who is responsible for making educational decisions on
behalf of the child if that person is someone other than the person who
has legal or actual charge or control of the child, and the child, when
appropriate, to address the barriers to attendance. The result of the
meeting or meetings shall be to develop a collaborative plan to reduce
barriers identified to improve regular attendance. The plan shall
include, if agreed to by the person who is responsible for making
educational decisions on behalf of the child, an educational evaluation
to determine whether any intellectual, academic, physical, or social-
emotional barriers are contributing factors to the lack of attendance.
The plan shall also consider, but not be limited to:
(i) The physical, mental, or behavioral health of the child;
(ii) Educational counseling;
(iii) Referral to community agencies for economic services;
(iv) Family or individual counseling;
(v) Assisting the family in working with other community services;
and
-10-

LB492 LB492
2025 2025
(vi) Referral to restorative justice practices or services.
(3) The school may report to the county attorney of the county in
which the person resides when the school has documented the efforts it
has made as required by subsection (2) of this section that the
collaborative plan to reduce barriers identified to improve regular
attendance has not been successful and that the child has accrued twenty
days or more of unexcused absences during the school year with a
documented loss of educational attainment as a result of such absences
been absent more than twenty days per school year. Such referral shall
indicate which of the unexcused absences during the school year, if any,
were absences excused by a parent or guardian for physical or mental
illness. The school shall notify the child's family in writing prior to
referring the child to the county attorney. Failure by the school to
document the efforts required by subsection (2) of this section is a
defense to prosecution under section 79-201 and to adjudication under
subdivision (3)(a) or (3)(b) of section 43-247 based upon such absences.
Illness that makes attendance impossible or impracticable shall not be
the basis for referral to the county attorney.
(4) Nothing in this section shall preclude a county attorney from
being involved at any stage in the process to address excessive
absenteeism.
Sec. 6. Original sections 79-206 and 79-209, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 43-245, 43-247, and 43-276, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-11-